pt-PT: Amortecimento da meia: Amortecimento total; Felpo total; Forte; Leve; Médio; Nenhum; Direcionado; Ultraleve; Outro
ja: 靴下のクッション性: フルクッション; フルテリー; ヘビー; ライト; ミディアム; なし; ターゲット; ウルトラライト; その他
tr: Çorap yastıklama seviyesi: Tam yastıklama; Tam havlu; Kalın; İnce; Orta; Yok; Bölgesel; Ultra hafif; Diğer
sv: Dämpning för strumpa: Hel dämpning; Hel frotté; Kraftig; Lätt; Medium; Ingen; Riktad; Ultralätt; Övrigt
fr: Amorti de la chaussette: Rembourrage intégral; Bouclettes intégrales; Épais; Léger; Moyen; Aucun; Ciblé; Ultra-léger; Autre
lt-LT: Kojinių paminkštinimas: Pilnas paminkštinimas; Pilno kilpinio audinio; Storas; Plonas; Vidutinis; Nėra; Tikslinis; Ypač plonas; Kita
cs: Polstrování ponožek: Plné tlumení; Plné froté; Silné; Lehké; Střední; Žádné; Cílené; Extrémně lehké; Jiné
sk-SK: Tlmenie v ponožke: Plné tlmenie; Plné froté; Vysoké; Nízke; Stredné; Žiadne; Cielené; Ultraľahké; Iné
fi: Sukan pehmuste: Täysi pehmuste; Kokofrotee; Paksu; Ohut; Keskipaksu; Ei mitään; Kohdennettu; Erittäin ohut; Muu
ru: Амортизация носков: Полная амортизация; Полная махра; Сильная; Лёгкая; Средняя; Нет; Зональная; Сверхлёгкая; Другое
sl-SI: Blazinjenje nogavic: Polno blaženje; Polni frotir; Močno; Rahlo; Srednje; Brez; Ciljno; Izjemno rahlo; Drugo
es: Amortiguación del calcetín: Amortiguación completa; Rizo completo; Alta; Ligera; Media; Ninguna; Específica; Ultraligera; Otro
ko: 양말 쿠션감: 풀 쿠션; 풀 테리; 헤비; 라이트; 미디엄; 없음; 타겟티드; 울트라 라이트; 기타
vi: Độ đệm của tất chân: Đệm toàn bộ; Sợi lông vòng toàn bộ; Dày; Nhẹ; Vừa; Không có đệm; Theo vùng; Rất nhẹ; Khác
en: Sock cushioning: Full cushion; Full terry; Heavy; Light; Medium; None; Targeted; Ultra light; Other
nl: Sok demping: Volledige demping; Volledig badstof; Veel; Licht; Gemiddeld; Geen; Gericht; Ultralicht; Anders
da: Sokpolstring: Fuld polstring; Fuld frotté; Kraftig; Let; Medium; Ingen; Målrettet; Ultralet; Andet
hu: Zokni párnázottsága: Teljes párnázás; Teljes frottír; Erős; Enyhe; Közepes; Nincs; Célzott; Ultrakönnyű; Egyéb
hr-HR: Amortizacija čarapa: Potpuna podstava; Puni frotir; Jaka; Lagana; Srednja; Bez; Ciljana; Iznimno lagana; Ostalo
nb: Sokkedemping: Full demping; Hel frotté; Kraftig; Lett; Middels; Ingen; Målrettet; Ultralett; Annet
bg-BG: Омекотяване на чорапа: Цялостно омекотяване; Цялостна хавлия; Плътно; Леко; Средно; Няма; Насочено; Свръхлеко; Друго
pt-BR: Meia amortecimento: Amortecimento total; Felpa em toda a peça; Pesado; Leve; Médio; Nenhum; Direcionado; Ultraleve; Outro
zh-TW: 襪子緩衝墊: 全緩衝; 全毛圈; 厚實; 輕量; 中等; 無; 局部加強; 超輕量; 其他
zh-CN: 袜子缓冲设计: 全掌缓震; 全毛圈; 重度; 轻度; 中度; 无; 定向缓震; 超轻; 其他
th: การรองรับแรงกระแทกของถุงเท้า: ซัพพอร์ตเต็มฝ่าเท้า; ผ้าขนหนูเต็มผืน; หนามาก; บาง; ปานกลาง; ไม่มี; เฉพาะจุด; บางเบาพิเศษ; อื่นๆ
pl: Amortyzacja skarpety: Pełna amortyzacja; Pełne frotte; Gruba; Lekka; Średnia; Brak; Strefowa; Bardzo lekka; Inne
it: Imbottitura della calza: Ammortizzazione completa; Spugna completa; Pesante; Leggera; Media; Nessuna; Mirata; Ultraleggera; Altra
ro-RO: Amortizare a șosetei: Amortizare completă; Terry complet; Ridicată; Ușoară; Medie; Fără; Direcționată; Ultra ușoară; Altele
de: Sockenpolsterung: Vollpolsterung; Vollfrottee; Stark; Leicht; Mittel; Keine; Gezielt; Ultraleicht; Andere
el: Αντικραδασμική προστασία κάλτσας: Πλήρης αντικραδασμική προστασία; Πλήρης επένδυση terry; Υψηλή; Ελαφριά; Μεσαία; Καμία; Στοχευμένη; Πολύ ελαφριά; Άλλο